Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226.02
River-flow enhancement bonds; termination of authority; effect on existing bonds and refunding bonds.

The authority to issue bonds for qualified projects granted in section 2-3226.01 terminates on January 1, 2023, except that (1) any bonds already issued and outstanding for qualified projects as of such date are permitted to remain outstanding and the district shall retain all powers of taxation provided for in section 2-3226.01 to provide for the payment of principal and interest on such bonds and (2) refunding bonds may continue to be issued and outstanding as of January 1, 2023, including extension of principal maturities if determined appropriate.

Laws 2007, LB701, § 7.